California, session 20252026, SB99.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6310 is added to the Family Code, to read:6310. (a) In determining whether to issue an order under this Part, the court may consider whether evidence submitted to it by either party that a military protective order has been issued against the respondent for the same or similar conduct against a person to be protected by the proposed order.(b) For the purposes of this section, “military protective order” means a protective order issued by a commanding officer in the Armed Forces of the United States, California National Guard, or the national guard of another state or territory against a person under the officer’s command.SEC. 2. Section 6383 of the Family Code is amended to read:6383. (a) A temporary restraining order, emergency protective order, or an order issued after hearing pursuant to this part shall, on request of the petitioner, be served on the respondent, whether or not the respondent has been taken into custody, either by a law enforcement officer, excluding those defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.5 of the Penal Code, who is present at the scene of reported domestic violence involving the parties to the proceeding or who receives a request from the petitioner to provide service of the order.(b) (1) The petitioner shall provide the officer with an endorsed copy of the order and a proof of service that the officer shall complete and transmit to the issuing court.(2) Service shall be provided pursuant to Section 6389 of the Family Code.(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a fee shall not be charged to the petitioner for service of an order described in subdivision (a).(4) If a firearm is obtained at the scene of a domestic violence incident or during service as provided in this section, law enforcement shall enter, or cause to be entered, the firearm into the Department of Justice Automated Firearms System pursuant to Section 11108.2 of the Penal Code.(c) It is a rebuttable presumption that the proof of service was signed on the date of service.(d) Upon receiving information at the scene of a domestic violence incident that a protective order has been issued under this part, that a military protective order has been issued, or that a person who has been taken into custody is the respondent to that protective order or military protective order, if the protected person cannot produce an endorsed copy of the relevant order, a law enforcement officer shall immediately inquire of the California Restraining and Protective Order System to verify the existence of a protective order or the National Crime Information Center to verify existence of a military protective order.(e) If the law enforcement officer determines that a protective order has been issued but not served, the officer shall immediately notify the respondent of the terms of the order and where a written copy of the order can be obtained, and the officer shall, at that time, also enforce the order. The law enforcement officer’s verbal notice of the terms of the order shall constitute service of the order and is sufficient notice for the purposes of this section and for the purposes of Sections 273.6 and 29825 of the Penal Code.(f) If a report is required under Section 13730 of the Penal Code, or if no report is required, then in the daily incident log, the officer shall provide the name and assignment of the officer notifying the respondent pursuant to subdivision (e) and the case number of the order.(g) Upon service of the order outside of the court, a law enforcement officer shall advise the respondent to go to the local court to obtain a copy of the order containing the full terms and conditions of the order.(h) (1) There shall be no civil liability on the part of, and no cause of action for false arrest or false imprisonment against, a peace officer who makes an arrest pursuant to a protective or restraining order that is regular upon its face, if the peace officer, in making the arrest, acts in good faith and has reasonable cause to believe that the person against whom the order is issued has notice of the order and has committed an act in violation of the order.(2) If there is more than one order issued and one of the orders is an emergency protective order that has precedence in enforcement pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 136.2 of the Penal Code, the peace officer shall enforce the emergency protective order. If there is more than one order issued, none of the orders issued is an emergency protective order that has precedence in enforcement, and one of the orders issued is a no-contact order, as described in Section 6320, the peace officer shall enforce the no-contact order. If there is more than one civil order regarding the same parties and neither an emergency protective order that has precedence in enforcement nor a no-contact order has been issued, the peace officer shall enforce the order that was issued last. If there are both civil and criminal orders regarding the same parties and neither an emergency protective order that has precedence in enforcement nor a no-contact order has been issued, the peace officer shall enforce the criminal order issued last, subject to the provisions of subdivisions (h) and (i) of Section 136.2 of the Penal Code. This section does not exonerate a peace officer from liability for the unreasonable use of force in the enforcement of the order. The immunities afforded by this section shall not affect the availability of any other immunity that may apply, including, but not limited to, Sections 820.2 and 820.4 of the Government Code.(i) A peace officer listed in Section 18250 of the Penal Code shall take temporary custody of any firearm or other deadly weapon in plain sight or discovered pursuant to a consensual or otherwise lawful search as necessary for the protection of the peace officer or other persons present in any of the following circumstances:(1) The peace officer is at the scene of a domestic violence incident involving a threat to human life or a physical assault.(2) The peace officer is serving a protective order issued pursuant to this part.(3) The peace officer is serving a gun violence restraining order issued pursuant to Division 3.2 (commencing with Section 18100) of Title 2 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.(j) If a law enforcement officer, pursuant to subdivision (d), determines that a military protective order registered in the National Crime Information Center systems (NCIC) has been issued against a person involved in the domestic violence incident who violates a provision of a protective order issued pursuant to this part or Part 5 (commencing with Section 6400), that officer shall notify the law enforcement agency that entered the military protective order into NCIC that the restrained party may be in violation of a military protective order.(k) Each law enforcement agency in the state that petitions for or enforces protective orders issued pursuant to this division may develop and adopt memoranda of understanding with military law enforcement or other designated representatives of one or more military installations located in whole or in part within the borders of its jurisdiction that govern the investigation and actions related to domestic violence involving service members assigned to units on those installations. Those memoranda may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) To whom, how, and when each party would report information about potential violations of military or civilian protective orders.(2) Each party’s role and responsibilities when conducting an investigation and in providing domestic violence prevention or rehabilitative services to a family in response to the results of the investigations, consistent with state and federal law.(3) Protocols describing what, if any, confidential information may be shared between the parties and for what purposes, in accordance with applicable state and federal law. (l) For the purposes of this section, “military protective order” has the same meaning as defined in Section 6326.5. 6310.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________